Utah statutes.
53B-16-103.   Granting of degrees, diplomas, or certification -- Board
approval -- Termination of previous approval.
(1) (a)  An institution of higher education may not issue a degree, diploma,
or certificate unless it first receives approval from the board of the
adequacy of the study for which the degree, diploma, or certificate is
offered.
(b)  A student shall demonstrate a reasonable understanding of the history,
principles, form of government, and economic system of the United States prior
to receiving a bachelor's degree or teaching credential.
(2)  Degrees, diplomas, and certificates issued prior to the effective date of
this chapter do not require board approval.
(3)  The board may terminate the granting of previously approved degrees,
diplomas, and certificates if they are inconsistent with the role prescribed
by the board for the affected institution.
